test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jaavvil_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - jäävvil: # 2B
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Nom: jäävvil
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Gen: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Acc: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Ill: jáhálân
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Loc: jáhálist
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Com: jáháláin
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Abe: jáhháálttáá
    jäävvil+N+Ess:    jävilin            #jáhálin
    jäävvil+N+Par:    jävilid            #jáhálid
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Nom: jáháleh
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Gen: jáhálij
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Acc: jáhálijd
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Ill: jáháláid
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Loc: jáhálijn
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Com: jáhálijguin
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Abe: jáhálijttáá
